Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.170

Qualifications of judges—Practice of law prohibited.

No person shall be eligible to the office of judge of the municipal court unless he or she shall have been admitted to practice law before the courts of record of this state and is an elector of the city in which he or she files for office. No judge of said court during his or her term of office shall engage either directly or indirectly in the practice of law.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2037; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.170. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 17.]